Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2607
Board; meetings; notice; open to public.

The State Board of Health shall meet at least once each quarter and at such other times as it deems necessary. Special meetings may be held upon the call of the chairperson or pursuant to a call signed by five other members of which the chairperson and the other members of the board shall have at least three days' notice. All regular meetings shall be held in suitable offices to be provided in the state office building described in section 81-1108.37 or elsewhere. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Every act of a majority of the members of the board shall be deemed to be the act of the board. All meetings shall be open to the public. The minutes of the meetings shall show the action of the board on matters presented and shall be open to public inspection.

Laws 1953, c. 335, § 13, p. 1103;

Laws 1969, c. 575, § 2, p. 2322;

Laws 2003, LB 56, § 5.